Illinois, session 104th, HB2715.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Acupuncture Practice Act is amended by 5adding Section 95 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 2/95 new)7    Sec. 95. Exemption for practice of the 5-needle protocol.8    (a) As used in this Section, "5-needle protocol" means a 9procedure where 5 needles are inserted into the external human 10ear to provide relief from the effects of behavioral health 11conditions. 12    (b) None of the provisions of this Act shall prevent an 13unlicensed person from engaging in the 5-needle protocol if 14the person: 15        (1) has appropriate training in the 5-needle ear 16    acupuncture protocol, including training established by 17    the National Acupuncture Detoxification Association or the 18    People's Organization of Community Acupuncture or similar 19    training approved by the Board; 20        (2) has appropriate training in clean needle 21    techniques; 22        (3) employs sterile, single-use needles without the 23    reuse of needles;   HB2715- 2 -LRB104 09487 AAS 19548 b1        (4) does not purport to treat any specific disease, 2    disorder, infirmity, or affliction; 3        (5) does not use any letters, words, or insignia 4    indicating or implying that he or she is an acupuncturist; 5    and 6        (6) makes no statements implying that his or her 7    practice of the 5-needle protocol is licensed, certified, 8    or otherwise regulated by the State. 9    (c) Treatment utilizing the 5-needle protocol as described 10by this Section shall be limited to the insertion of 11disposable, sterile acupuncture needles into the ear and only 12in compliance with the 5-needle protocol. The application or 13insertion of needles anywhere else on the body of another 14person by a person acting under the provisions of this Section 15shall be considered engaging in the practice of acupuncture 16without a license.